Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4712
Nonduplication of coverage.

Notwithstanding any other law of this state, no prepaid limited health service organization, health maintenance organization, accident and health insurance company, or fraternal benefit society shall be required to include, in any contract or policy issued to a group, any coverage that would duplicate the coverage for limited health services, whether in the form of services, supplies, or reimbursement, which is provided in accordance with the Prepaid Limited Health Service Organization Act under a contract or policy issued to the same group or to a part of that group by a prepaid limited health service organization, a health maintenance organization, an accident and health insurance company, or a fraternal benefit society.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 12.